California, session 20252026, AB2776.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25117.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25117.5. Waste that is hazardous only because it is medical waste, as defined in the Medical Waste Management Act (Part 14 (commencing with Section 117600) of Division 104) shall not be governed by, subject to fees assessed by, or otherwise subject to, the requirements of this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.SEC. 2. Section 25123.3 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25123.3. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall apply:(1) “Liquid hazardous waste” means a hazardous waste that meets the definition of free liquids, as specified in Section 66260.10 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, as that section read on January 1, 1994.(2) “Remediation waste staging” means the temporary accumulation of non-RCRA contaminated soil that is generated and held onsite, and that is accumulated for the purpose of onsite treatment pursuant to a certified, authorized, or permitted treatment method, such as a transportable treatment unit, if all of the following requirements are met:(A) The hazardous waste being accumulated does not contain free liquids.(B) The hazardous waste is accumulated on an impermeable surface, such as high density polyethylene (HDPE) of at least 20 mils that is supported by a foundation, or HDPE of at least 60 mils that is not supported by a foundation.(C) The generator provides controls for windblown dispersion and precipitation runoff and run-on and complies with any stormwater permit requirements issued by a California regional water quality control board.(D) The generator has the accumulation site inspected weekly and after storms to ensure that the controls for windblown dispersion and precipitation runoff and run-on are functioning properly.(E) The staging area is certified by a registered engineer for compliance with the standards specified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive.(3) “Transfer facility” means any offsite facility that is related to the transportation of hazardous waste, including, but not limited to, loading docks, parking areas, storage areas, and other similar areas where shipments of hazardous waste are held during the normal course of transportation.(b) “Storage facility” means a hazardous waste facility at which the hazardous waste meets any of the following requirements:(1) The hazardous waste is held for greater than 90 days at an onsite facility. The department may establish criteria and procedures to extend that 90-day period, consistent with the federal act, and to prescribe the manner in which the hazardous waste may be held if not otherwise prescribed by statute.(2) The hazardous waste is held for any period of time at an offsite facility that is not a transfer facility.(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the waste is held at a transfer facility and any one of the following apply:(i) The transfer facility is located in an area zoned residential by the local planning authority.(ii) The transfer facility commences initial operations on or after January 1, 2005, at a site located within 500 feet of a structure identified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (c) of Section 25227.(iii) The hazardous waste is held for a period greater than six days at a transfer facility that is located in an area that is not zoned industrial or agricultural by the local planning authority.(iv) The hazardous waste is held for a period greater than 10 days at a transfer facility that is located in an area that is zoned industrial or agricultural by the local planning authority.(v) The hazardous waste is held for a period greater than six days at a transfer facility that commenced initial operations before January 1, 2005, is located in an area zoned agricultural by the local planning authority, and is located within 500 feet of a structure identified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (c) of Section 25227.(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a transfer facility located in an area that is not zoned residential by the local planning authority is not a storage facility, if the only hazardous waste held at the transfer facility is hazardous waste that is generated as a result of an emergency release and that hazardous waste is collected and temporarily stored by emergency response personnel, as defined in Section 25501, or by a response action contractor upon the request of emergency response personnel or the response action contractor, and the holding of that hazardous waste is approved by the department.(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “response action contractor” means any person who enters into a contract with the department to take removal or remedial action pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 in response to a release or threatened release, including any subcontractors of the response action contractor.(4) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the hazardous waste is held onsite for any period of time, unless the hazardous waste is held in a container, tank, drip pad, or containment building pursuant to regulations adopted by the department.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a generator that accumulates hazardous waste generated and held onsite for 90 days or less for offsite transportation is not a storage facility if all of the following requirements are met:(i) The waste is non-RCRA contaminated soil.(ii) The hazardous waste being accumulated does not contain free liquids.(iii) The hazardous waste is accumulated on an impermeable surface, such as HDPE of at least 20 mils that is supported by a foundation, or HDPE of at least 60 mils that is not supported by a foundation.(iv) The generator provides controls for windblown dispersion and precipitation runoff and run-on and complies with any stormwater permit requirements issued by a California regional water quality control board.(v) The generator has the accumulation site inspected weekly and after storms to ensure that the controls for windblown dispersion and precipitation runoff and run-on are functioning properly.(vi) The generator, after final offsite transportation, inspects the accumulation site for contamination and remediates as necessary.(vii) The site is certified by a registered engineer for compliance with the standards specified in clauses (i) to (vi), inclusive.(5) The hazardous waste is held at a transfer facility at any location for any period of time in a manner other than in a container.(6) The hazardous waste is held at a transfer facility at any location for any period of time and handling occurs. For purposes of this paragraph, “handling” does not include the transfer of packaged or containerized hazardous waste from one vehicle to another.(c) The time period for calculating the 90-day period for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), or the 180-day or 270-day period for purposes of subdivision (h), begins when the facility has accumulated 100 kilograms of hazardous waste or one 1 kilogram of extremely hazardous waste or acutely hazardous waste. However, if the facility generates more than 100 kilograms of hazardous waste or one 1 kilogram of extremely hazardous waste or acutely hazardous waste during any calendar month, the time period begins when any amount of hazardous waste first begins to accumulate in that month.(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), a generator of hazardous waste that accumulates waste onsite is not a storage facility if all of the following requirements are met:(1) The generator accumulates a maximum of 55 gallons of hazardous waste, one quart of acutely hazardous waste, or one quart of extremely hazardous waste at an initial accumulation point that is at or near the area where the waste is generated and that is under the control of the operator of the process generating the waste.(2) The generator accumulates the waste in containers other than tanks.(3) The generator does not hold the hazardous waste onsite without a hazardous waste facilities permit or other grant of authorization for a period of time longer than the shorter of the following time periods:(A) One year from the initial date of accumulation.(B) Ninety days, or if subdivision (h) is applicable, 180 or 270 days, from the date that the quantity limitation specified in paragraph (1) is reached.(4) The generator labels any container used for the accumulation of hazardous waste with the initial date of accumulation and with the words “hazardous waste” or other words that identify the contents of the container.(5) Within three days of reaching any applicable quantity limitation specified in paragraph (1), the generator labels the container holding the accumulated hazardous waste with the date the quantity limitation was reached and either transports the waste offsite or holds the waste onsite and complies with either the regulations adopted by the department establishing requirements for generators subject to the time limit specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) or the requirements specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h), whichever requirements are applicable.(6) The generator complies with regulations adopted by the department pertaining to the use and management of containers and any other regulations adopted by the department to implement this subdivision.(e) (1) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (4) of subdivision (b), hazardous waste held for remediation waste staging shall not be considered to be held at a hazardous waste storage facility if the total accumulation period is one year or less from the date of the initial placing of hazardous waste by the generator at the staging site for onsite remediation, except that the department may grant one six-month extension, upon a showing of reasonable cause by the generator.(2) (A) The generator shall submit a notification of plans to store and treat hazardous waste onsite pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), in person or by certified mail, with return receipt requested, to the department and to one of the following:(i) The CUPA, if the generator is under the jurisdiction of a CUPA.(ii) If the generator is not under the jurisdiction of a CUPA, the notification shall be submitted to the agency authorized, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 25404.3, to implement and enforce the requirements of this chapter listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 25404.(B) If, after the notification pursuant to subparagraph (A), or during the initial year or the six-month extension granted by the department, the generator determines that treatment cannot be accomplished for all, or part of, the hazardous waste accumulated in a remediation waste staging area, the generator shall immediately notify the department and the appropriate local agency, pursuant to subparagraph (A), that the treatment has been discontinued. The generator shall then handle and dispose of the hazardous waste in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).(C) A generator shall not hold hazardous waste for remediation waste staging unless the generator can show, through laboratory testing, bench scale testing, or other documentation, that soil held for remediation waste staging is potentially treatable. Any fines and penalties imposed for a violation of this subparagraph may be imposed beginning with the 91st day that the hazardous waste was initially accumulated.(3) Once an onsite treatment operation is completed on hazardous waste held pursuant to paragraph (1), the generator shall inspect the staging area for contamination and remediate as necessary.(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, remediation waste staging and the holding of non-RCRA contaminated soil for offsite transportation in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) shall not be considered to be disposal or land disposal of hazardous waste.(g) A generator who holds hazardous waste for remediation waste staging pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) or who holds hazardous waste onsite for offsite transportation pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) shall maintain records onsite that demonstrate compliance with this section related to storing hazardous waste for remediation waste staging or related to holding hazardous waste onsite for offsite transportation, as applicable. The records maintained pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for review by a public agency authorized pursuant to Section 25180 or 25185.(h) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), a generator of less than 1,000 kilograms of hazardous waste in any calendar month who accumulates hazardous waste onsite for 180 days or less, or 270 days or less if the generator transports the generator’s own waste, or offers the generator’s waste for transportation, over a distance of 200 miles or more, for offsite treatment, storage, or disposal, is not a storage facility if the generator complies with the requirements of Section 66262.16 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) A generator meeting the requirements of paragraph (1) who does not receive a copy of the manifest with the signature of the owner or operator of the facility to which the generator’s waste is submitted or is unable to verify through the e-Manifest system that the facility has received the waste and signed the manifest, within 60 days from the date that the hazardous waste was accepted by the initial transporter, shall submit an exception report to the e-Manifest system along with a legible copy of the manifest indicating that the generator cannot confirm the delivery or receipt of the generator’s waste with the owner or operator of the facility.(i) The department may adopt regulations that set forth additional restrictions and enforceable management standards that protect human health and the environment and that apply to persons holding hazardous waste at a transfer facility. A regulation adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare, and may be adopted as an emergency regulation in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. Section 25123.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25123.5. (a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), “treatment” means any method, technique, or process that is not otherwise excluded from the definition of treatment by this chapter and that is designed to change the physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of any hazardous waste or any material contained in the hazardous waste, or that removes or reduces its harmful properties or characteristics for any purpose.(b) (1) “Treatment” does not include any of the activities listed in paragraph (2), if one of the following requirements is met:(A) The activity is conducted onsite in accordance with this chapter and the department’s regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter governing the generation and accumulation of hazardous waste.(B) The activity is conducted in accordance with the conditions specified in a permit issued by the department for the storage of hazardous waste.(2) The activities subject to the exemption specified in paragraph (1) include all of the following:(A) Sieving or filtering liquid hazardous waste to remove solid fractions, without added heat, chemicals, or pressure, as the waste is added to or removed from a storage or accumulation tank or container. For purposes of this subparagraph, sieving or filtering does not include adsorption, reverse osmosis, or ultrafiltration.(B) Phase separation of hazardous waste during storage or accumulation in tanks or containers, if the separation is unaided by the addition of heat or chemicals. If the phase separation occurs at a commercial offsite permitted storage facility, all phases of the hazardous waste shall be managed as hazardous waste after separation.(C) Combining two or more waste streams that are not incompatible into a single tank or container if both of the following conditions apply:(i) The waste streams are being combined solely for the purpose of consolidated accumulation or storage or consolidated offsite shipment, and they are not being combined to meet a fuel specification or to otherwise be chemically or physically prepared to be treated, burned for energy value, or incinerated.(ii) The combined waste stream is managed in compliance with the most stringent of the regulatory requirements applicable to each individual waste stream.(D) Evaporation of water from hazardous wastes in tanks or containers, such as breathing and evaporation through vents and floating roofs, without the addition of pressure, chemicals, or heat other than sunlight or ambient room lighting or heating.(E) (i)Compaction of hazardous waste, which may include the compaction of nonliquid waste materials, such as used personal protective equipment, absorbent pads, wipes, and similar solid materials, if all of the following conditions apply:(I)(i) The waste being compacted is not a liquid, as defined by the SW-846 Method 9095B Paint Filter Liquids Test, or a solid that meets the ignitability characteristic, as defined in Section 66261.21 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, or the reactivity characteristic, as defined in Section 66261.23 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(II)(ii) The compaction does not alter the physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of the waste, other than the reduction in volume of the waste, increase in density, or changes in shape or form.(III)(iii) The compaction does not result in the production of fugitive dust, fire, or explosion.(ii)This subparagraph applies to the compaction of nonliquid waste materials, such as used personal protective equipment, absorbent pads, wipes, and similar solid materials, when the compaction meets criteria described in subclauses (I) through (III), inclusive, of clause (i).(3) This subdivision does not apply to any activity for which a hazardous waste facilities permit for treatment is required under the federal act.(c) “Treatment” does not include the combination of glutaraldehyde or orthophthalaldehyde, which is used by medical facilities to disinfect medical devices, with formulations containing glycine as the sole active chemical, if the process is carried out onsite.SEC. 4. Section 25125.7 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25125.7. (a) The board shall annually prepare, post on its internet website, and transmit to the Secretary for Environmental Protection an annual review of the department’s performance as compared to its objectives, including, but not limited to, the performance of the director.(b) To the extent feasible using existing resources, the review described in subdivision (a) may also include any of the following:(1) A review of the department’s performance as measured by the performance metrics adopted pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 25125.2.(2) Recommendations pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 25125.2.(3) Recommendations for legislative, Legislative, regulatory, and budgetary changes needed that the board has identified as necessary to improve the performance of any of the department’s programs.(4) Findings from the subcommittees pursuant to Section 25125.3 and the ombudsperson pursuant to Section 25125.8 that the chairperson of the board, in their discretion, deems significant.(c) The review components described in subdivision (b) shall not result in an increase in the amount of fees imposed under Article 9.1 (commencing with Section 25205.1).SEC. 5. Section 25160 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25160. (a) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(1) “Manifest” means a shipping document originated and signed by a generator of hazardous waste that contains all of the information required by the department and that complies with all applicable federal and state regulations, and includes any of the following:(A) A California Uniform Hazardous Waste Manifest, which was a manifest document printed and supplied by the state for a shipment initiated on or before September 4, 2006.(B) A Uniform Hazardous Waste Manifest, which is United States Environmental Protection Agency Form 8700-22 (Manifest) and includes, if necessary, Form 8700-22A (Manifest Continuation Sheet), printed by a source registered with the United States Environmental Protection Agency for a shipment initiated on or after September 5, 2006.(C) (i) An electronic manifest, which is the electronic format of a hazardous waste manifest, that is obtained from the electronic manifest system and transmitted electronically to the system, that is the legal equivalent of United States Environmental Protection Agency Forms 8700-22 and 8700-22A, as specified in Section 25160.01.(ii) A printed copy of the manifest from the e-Manifest system.(2) “Electronic manifest system” or “e-Manifest system” means the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s national information technology system through which an electronic manifest may be obtained, completed, transmitted, and distributed to users of the electronic manifest, and to regulatory agencies.(3) For purposes of this section, a shipment is initiated on the date when the manifest is signed by the first transporter and the hazardous waste leaves the site where it is generated.(b) (1) Except as provided in Section 25160.2 or 25160.8, or as otherwise authorized by a variance issued by the department, a person generating hazardous waste that is transported, or submitted for transportation, for offsite handling, treatment, storage, disposal, or any combination thereof, shall complete a manifest before the waste is transported or offered for transportation, and shall designate on that manifest the facility to which the waste is to be shipped for the handling, treatment, storage, disposal, or combination thereof. The manifest shall be completed as required by the department. The generator shall provide the manifest to the person who will transport the hazardous waste, who is the driver, if the hazardous waste will be transported by vehicle, or the person designated by the railroad corporation or vessel operator, if the hazardous waste will be transported by rail or vessel.(A) The generator shall use the manifest shipping document United States Environmental Protection Agency Form 8700-22 and include, if necessary, Form 8700-22A, or an electronic manifest, which is the electronic format of a hazardous waste manifest, that is obtained from the e-Manifest system, and that is the legal equivalent of United States Environmental Protection Agency Forms 8700-22 and 8700-22A, as specified in Section 25160.01.(B) A manifest shall only be used for the purposes specified in this chapter, including, but not limited to, identifying materials that the person completing the manifest reasonably believes are hazardous waste.(C) Within 30 days from the date of transport, or submission for transport, of hazardous waste, each generator of that hazardous waste using a paper manifest shall submit to the department a legible copy of each paper manifest used. The copy submitted to the department shall contain the signatures of the generator and the transporter. The generator is not required to send the department a copy of an electronic manifest processed completely through the e-Manifest system.(2) Except as provided in Section 25160.2 or 25160.8 or as otherwise authorized by a variance issued by the department, a person generating hazardous waste that is transported, or submitted for transportation, for offsite handling, treatment, storage, disposal, or any combination thereof, outside of the state, shall complete, whether or not the waste is determined to be hazardous by the importing country or state, a manifest in accordance with both of the following conditions:(A) The generator shall use the manifest shipping document United States Environmental Protection Agency Form 8700-22 and include, if necessary, Form 8700-22A, or an electronic manifest, which is the electronic format of a hazardous waste manifest, that is obtained from the e-Manifest system, and that is the legal equivalent of United States Environmental Protection Agency Forms 8700-22 and 8700-22A, as specified in Section 25160.01.(B) The generator shall submit a legible printed copy of any paper manifest used in accordance with subparagraph (A) to the department within 30 days from the date of the transport, or submission for transport, of the hazardous waste. The generator is not required to send the department a copy of an electronic manifest processed completely through the e-Manifest system.(3) Within 30 days from the date of transport, or submission for transport, of hazardous waste out of state, each generator of that hazardous waste using a paper manifest shall submit to the department a legible printed copy of each paper manifest used. The copy submitted to the department shall contain the signatures of the generator and the initial transporter. If within 45 days from the date of the initial shipment, or for exports by water to foreign countries 60 days after the initial shipment, the generator has not received a copy of the manifest signed by all transporters and the facility operator or received verification through the e-Manifest system that the shipment has been received by the designated facility, the generator shall contact the owner or operator of the designated facility to determine the status of the hazardous waste and to request that the owner or operator immediately provide a signed copy of the manifest to the generator. Except as provided otherwise in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 25123.3, if within 60 days from the date of the initial shipment or, for exports by water to foreign countries, 90 days from the date of the initial shipment, the generator has not received a copy of the signed manifest or verification through the e-Manifest system from the facility owner or operator that the shipment has been received and the manifest has been signed by the designated facility, the generator shall submit an exception report to the e-Manifest system.(4) For shipments of waste that do not require a manifest pursuant to Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department, by regulation, may require that a manifest be used.(5) (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, except as provided in subparagraph (B), the generator is not required to submit a copy of the manifest to the department for any waste transported in compliance with the consolidated manifest procedures in Section 25160.2 or with the procedures specified in Section 25160.8, or when the transporter is operating pursuant to a variance issued by the department pursuant to Section 25143 authorizing the use of a consolidated manifest for waste not listed in Section 25160.2, if the generator, transporter, and facility are all identified as the same company on the hazardous waste manifest. If multiple identification numbers are used by a single company, all of the company’s identification numbers shall be included in its annual transporter registration application, if those numbers will be used with the consolidated manifest procedure. This paragraph does not affect the obligation of a facility operator to submit information regarding the shipment it receives through a consolidated manifest into the e-Manifest system.(B) If the waste subject to subparagraph (A) is transported out of state, the generator shall submit a legible copy of the paper manifest to the department that contains the signatures of the generator and the initial transporter. The generator is not required to send the department a copy of an electronic manifest processed completely through the e-Manifest system.(c) (1) The department shall determine the form and manner in which a manifest shall be completed and the information that the manifest shall contain. The form of each manifest and the information requested on each manifest shall be the same for all hazardous wastes, regardless of whether the hazardous wastes are also regulated pursuant to the federal act or by regulations adopted by the United States Department of Transportation. However, the form of the manifest and the information required shall be consistent with federal regulations.(2) Pursuant to federal regulations, the department may require information on the manifest in addition to the information required by federal regulations.(d) (1) A person who transports hazardous waste in a vehicle shall either have a legible copy of the paper manifest in their possession while transporting the hazardous waste or shall have an electronic manifest accessible during transportation that the person forwarded to the person or persons who are scheduled to receive delivery of the waste shipment. To the extent that Section 177.817 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations requires transporters of hazardous materials to carry a paper document, a hazardous waste transporter shall carry one printed copy of the paper or electronic manifest on the transport vehicle. The manifest shall be shown upon demand to any representative of the department, any officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, any local health officer, any certified unified program agency, or any local public officer designated by the director. If the hazardous waste is transported by rail or vessel, the railroad corporation or vessel operator shall comply with Subchapter C (commencing with Section 171.1) of Chapter 1 of Subtitle B of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations and shall also enter on the shipping papers any information concerning the hazardous waste that the department may require.(2) Any person who transports a waste, as defined by Section 25124, and who is provided with a manifest for that waste shall, while transporting that waste, comply with all requirements of this chapter, and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, concerning the transportation of hazardous waste.(3) A person who transports hazardous waste shall transfer a copy of the manifest to the facility operator at the time of delivery, or to the person who will subsequently transport the hazardous waste in a vehicle. A person who transports hazardous waste and then transfers custody of that hazardous waste to a person who will subsequently transport that waste by rail or vessel shall transfer a copy of the manifest to the person designated by the railroad corporation or vessel operator, as specified by Subchapter C (commencing with Section 171.1) of Chapter 1 of Subtitle B of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The transfer of a manifest under this paragraph may be completed by either the transfer of a paper manifest or a transfer by electronic manifest transmitted to the facility operator by submission to the e-Manifest system.(4) A person transporting hazardous waste by motor vehicle, rail, or water shall certify to the department, at the time of initial registration and at the time of renewal of that registration pursuant to this article, that the transporter is familiar with the requirements of this section, the department regulations, and federal laws and regulations governing the use of manifests.(e) (1) A facility operator in the state who receives hazardous waste for handling, treatment, storage, disposal, or any combination thereof, which was transported with a manifest pursuant to this section, shall comply with the requirements of Section 264.71 or 265.71 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as applicable, pertaining to receipt of that shipment.(2) Any treatment, storage, or disposal facility receiving hazardous waste generated outside this state may only accept the hazardous waste for treatment, storage, disposal, or any combination thereof, if the hazardous waste is accompanied by a completed paper or electronic manifest.(3) A facility operator may accept hazardous waste generated offsite that is not accompanied by a properly completed and signed paper or electronic manifest if the facility operator meets both of the following conditions:(A) The facility operator is authorized to accept the hazardous waste pursuant to a hazardous waste facilities permit or other grant of authorization from the department.(B) The facility operator is in compliance with the regulations adopted by the department specifying the conditions and procedures applicable to the receipt of hazardous waste under these circumstances.(4) This subdivision applies only to shipments of hazardous waste for which a manifest is required pursuant to this section and the regulations adopted pursuant to this section.(f) The department shall make available for review, by any interested party, the department’s plans for revising and enhancing its system for tracking hazardous waste for purposes of protecting human health and the environment, enforcing laws, collecting revenue, and generating necessary reports.(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022, and shall apply to the fees due for the 2022 reporting period and thereafter, including the prepayments due during the reporting period and the fee due and payable following the reporting period.SEC. 6. Section 25201.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25201.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a hazardous waste facilities permit is not required for a generator who treats hazardous waste of a total weight of not more than 500 pounds, or a total volume of not more than 55 gallons, in any calendar month, if both of the following conditions are met:(1) The hazardous waste is not an extremely hazardous waste and is listed in Section 67450.11 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, as in effect on January 1, 1992, as eligible for treatment pursuant to the regulations adopted by the department for operation under a permit-by-rule and the treatment technology used is approved for that waste stream in Section 67450.11 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations for treatment under a permit-by-rule.(2) The generator is not otherwise required to obtain a hazardous waste facilities permit or other grant of authorization for any other hazardous waste management activity at the facility.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, treatment in the following units is ineligible for exemption pursuant to subdivision (a) or (c):(1)  Landfills.(2)  Surface impoundments.(3)  Injection wells.(4)  Waste piles.(5) Land treatment units.(6) Thermal destruction units.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a hazardous waste facilities permit or other grant of authorization is not required to conduct the following treatment activities, if the generator treats the following hazardous waste streams using the treatment technology required by this subdivision:(1) The generator mixes or cures resins mixed in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions, including the mixing or curing of multicomponent and preimpregnated resins in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions.(2) The generator treats a container of 110 gallons or less capacity, which is not constructed of wood, paper, cardboard, fabric, or any other similar absorptive material, for purposes of emptying the container as specified by Section 66261.7 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, as revised July 1, 1990, or treats the inner liners removed from empty containers that once held hazardous waste or hazardous material. The generator shall treat the container or inner liner by using the following technologies, if the treated containers and rinseate rinsate are managed in compliance with the applicable requirements of this chapter:(A) The generator rinses the container or inner liner with a suitable liquid capable of dissolving or removing the hazardous constituents that the container held.(B) The generator uses physical processes, such as crushing, shredding, grinding, or puncturing, that change only the physical properties of the container or inner liner, if the container or inner liner is first rinsed as provided in subparagraph (A) and the rinseate rinsate is removed from the container or inner liner.(3) The generator conducts drying by pressing or by passive or heat-aided evaporation to remove water from wastes classified as special wastes by the department pursuant to Section 66261.124 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(4) The generator conducts magnetic separation or screening to remove components from wastes classified as special wastes by the department pursuant to Section 66261.124 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(5) The generator neutralizes acidic or alkaline wastes that are hazardous solely due to corrosivity or toxicity resulting from the presence of acidic or alkaline material from food or food byproducts, and alkaline or acidic waste, other than wastes containing nitric acid, at SIC Code Major Group 20, food and kindred product facilities, if both of the following conditions are met:(A) The neutralization process does not result in the emission of volatile hazardous waste constituents or toxic air contaminants.(B) The neutralization process is required in order to meet discharge or other regulatory requirements.(6) Except as provided for specific waste streams in Section 25200.3, the generator conducts the separation by gravity of the following, if the activity is conducted in impervious tanks or containers constructed of noncorrosive materials, the activity does not involve the addition of heat or other form of treatment, or the addition of chemicals other than flocculants and demulsifiers, and the activity is managed in compliance with applicable requirements of federal, state, or local agency or treatment works:(A) The settling of solids from waste where the resulting aqueous stream is not hazardous.(B) The separation of oil/water mixtures and separation sludges, if the average oil recovered per month is less than 25 barrels.(7) The generator is a laboratory that is certified by the State Water Resources Control Board or operated by an educational institution, and treats wastewater generated onsite solely as a result of analytical testing, or is a laboratory that treats less than one gallon of hazardous waste, which is generated onsite, in any single batch, subject to the following:(A) The wastewater treated is hazardous solely due to corrosivity or toxicity that results only from the acidic or alkaline material or is excluded from the definition of hazardous waste by subsection (f) of Section 66261.3 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, or both.(B) The treatment meets all of the following requirements, in addition to all other requirements of this section:(i) The treatment complies with all applicable pretreatment requirements.(ii) Neutralization occurs in elementary neutralization units, as defined in Section 66260.10 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations; wastes to be neutralized do not contain any more than 10 percent acid or base concentration by weight, or any other concentration limit that may be imposed by the department; and vessels and piping for neutralization are constructed of materials that are compatible with the range of temperatures and pH levels, and subject to appropriate pH temperature controls.(iii) Treatment does not result in the emission of volatile hazardous waste constituents or toxic air contaminants.(8) The hazardous waste treatment is carried out in a quality control or quality assurance laboratory at a facility that is not an offsite hazardous waste facility and the treatment activity otherwise meets the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(9) Any waste stream technology combination certified by the department, pursuant to Section 25200.1.5, as suitable for authorization pursuant to this section, that operates pursuant to the conditions imposed on that certification.(10) The generator uses any technology that is certified by the department, pursuant to Section 25200.1.5, as effective for the treatment of formaldehyde or glutaraldehyde solutions used in health care facilities that are operated pursuant to the conditions imposed on the certification and that makes the operation appropriate to this tier. The technology may be certified using a pilot certification process until the department adopts regulations pursuant to Section 25200.1.5. This paragraph shall be operative only until April 11, 1996.(d) A generator conducting treatment pursuant to subdivision (a) or (c) shall meet all of the following conditions:(1) The waste being treated is generated onsite, and a residual material from the treatment of a hazardous waste generated offsite is not a waste that has been generated onsite.(2) The treatment does not require a hazardous waste facilities permit pursuant to the federal act.(3) The generator prepares and maintains written operating instructions and a record of the dates, amounts, and types of waste treated.(4) The generator prepares and maintains a written inspection schedule and log of inspections conducted.(5)  The records specified in paragraphs (3) and (4) are maintained onsite for a period of three years.(6) The generator maintains adequate records to demonstrate that it is in compliance with all applicable pretreatment standards and with all applicable industrial waste discharge requirements issued by the agency operating the publicly owned treatment works into which the wastes are discharged.(7) (A) Not less than 60 days before commencing treatment of hazardous waste pursuant to this section, the generator shall submit a notification, in person, into the statewide information management system, or by certified mail, with return receipt requested, to the department and to one of the following:(i) The CUPA, if the generator is under the jurisdiction of a CUPA.(ii)  If the generator is not under the jurisdiction of a CUPA, the notification shall be submitted to the officer or agency authorized, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 25404.3, to implement and enforce the requirements of this chapter listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 25404.(B) Upon demonstration of good cause by the generator, the department may allow a shorter time period than the 60 days required by subparagraph (A) between notification and commencement of hazardous waste treatment pursuant to this section.(C)  The notification submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall be completed, dated, and signed in accordance with the requirements of Section 66270.11 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, as those requirements apply to permit applications, shall be on a form prescribed by the department, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:(i) The name, identification number, site address, mailing address, and telephone number of the generator to whom the conditional exemption applies.(ii) A description of the physical characteristics and chemical composition of the hazardous waste to which the conditional exemption applies.(iii) A description of the hazardous waste treatment activity to which the conditional exemption applies, including, but not limited to, the basis for determining that a hazardous waste facilities permit is not required under the federal act.(iv) A description of the characteristics and management of any treatment residuals.(D) The development and publication of the notification form required under this paragraph is not subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The department shall hold at least one public workshop concerning the development of the notification form.(E) Any notification submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall supersede any prior notice of intent submitted by the same generator in order to obtain a permit-by-rule under the regulations adopted by the department. This subparagraph does not require the department to refund any fees paid for any application in conjunction with the submission of a notice of intent for a permit-by-rule.(8) (A) Upon terminating operation of any treatment process or unit exempted pursuant to this section, the generator who conducted the treatment shall remove or decontaminate all waste residues, containment system components, soils, and other structures or equipment contaminated with hazardous waste from the unit. The removal of the unit from service shall be conducted in a manner that does both of the following:(i) Minimizes the need for further maintenance.(ii) Eliminates the escape of hazardous waste, hazardous constituents, leachate, contaminated runoff, or waste decomposition products to the environment after treatment process is no longer in operation.(B) Any owner or operator who permanently ceases operation of a treatment process or unit that is conditionally exempted pursuant to this section shall, upon completion of all activities required under this subdivision, provide written notification in person, into the statewide information management system, or by certified mail, with return receipt requested, to the department and to one of the following:(i) The CUPA, if the generator is under the jurisdiction of a CUPA.(ii) If the generator is not under the jurisdiction of a CUPA, the notification shall be submitted to the officer or agency authorized, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 25404.3, to implement and enforce the requirements of this chapter listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 25404.(9) The waste is managed in accordance with all applicable requirements for generators of hazardous waste under this chapter and the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter.(10) Except as provided in Section 25404.5, the generator submits a fee in the amount required by Section 25205.2, unless the generator is subject to a fee under a permit-by-rule or a grant of conditional authorization pursuant to Section 25200.3. The generator shall submit that fee within 30 days of the date that the fee is assessed by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.(e) (1) Unless otherwise required by federal law, ancillary equipment for a tank or container treating hazardous wastes solely pursuant to this section is not subject to Section 66265.193 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, if the ancillary equipment’s integrity is attested to pursuant to Section 66265.191 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations every two years from the date that retrofitting requirements would otherwise apply.(2) (A) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, in the case of underground, gravity-pressured sewer systems, integrity testing is often not feasible.(B) The department shall, by regulation, determine the best feasible leak detection measures that are sufficient to ensure that underground gravity-pressured sewer systems, for which it is not feasible to conduct integrity testing, do not leak.(C) If it is not feasible for an operator’s ancillary equipment, or a portion of that equipment, to undergo integrity testing, the operator shall not be subject to Section 66265.193 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, if the operator implements the best feasible leak detection measures that are determined to be sufficient by the department in those regulations, and those leak detection measures do not reveal any leaks emanating from the operator’s ancillary equipment. Any ancillary equipment found to leak shall be retrofitted by the operator to meet the full secondary containment standards of Section 66265.196 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(f) This section shall not abridge any authority granted to the department, a unified program agency, or local health officer or local public officer designated pursuant to Section 25180, by any other law to impose any further restrictions or limitations upon facilities subject to this section, that the department, a unified program agency, or local health officer or local public officer designated pursuant to Section 25180, determines to be necessary to protect human health or the environment.(g) A generator that would otherwise be subject to this section may contract with the operator of a transportable treatment unit who is operating pursuant to this section to treat the generator’s waste. If treatment of the generator’s waste takes place under such a contract, the generator is not otherwise subject to the requirements of this section, but shall comply with all other requirements of this chapter that apply to generators. The operator of the transportable treatment unit shall comply with all of the applicable requirements of this section and, for purposes of this section, the operator of the transportable treatment unit shall be deemed to be the generator.(h) A generator conducting activities that are exempt from this chapter pursuant to Section 66261.7 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, as that section read on January 1, 1993, is not required to comply with this section.(i) (1) Within 30 days of any change in operation that necessitates modifying any of the information submitted in the notification required pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (d), a generator shall submit an amended notification, in person, into the statewide information management system, or by certified mail, with return receipt requested, to the department and to one of the following:(A) The CUPA, if the generator is under the jurisdiction of a CUPA.(B) If the generator is not under the jurisdiction of a CUPA, the notification shall be submitted to the officer or agency authorized, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 25404.3, to implement and enforce the requirements of this chapter listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 25404.(2) Each amended notification made pursuant to this subdivision shall be completed, dated, and signed in accordance with the requirements of Section 66270.11 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, as those requirements apply to hazardous waste facilities permit applications.(j) A person who submitted a notification to the department pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (d) shall be deemed to be operating pursuant to this section, and, except as provided in Section 25404.5, shall be subject to the fee set forth in Section 25205.2, until that person submits a certification that the generator has ceased all treatment activities of hazardous waste streams authorized pursuant to this section in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (8) of subdivision (d). The certification required by this subdivision shall be submitted, in person, into the statewide information management system, or by certified mail, with return receipt requested, to the department and to one of the following:(1) The CUPA, if the generator is under the jurisdiction of a CUPA.(2) If the generator is not under the jurisdiction of a CUPA, the notification shall be submitted to the officer or agency authorized, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 25404.3, to implement and enforce the requirements of this chapter listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 25404.SEC. 7. Section 25218.1 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25218.1. For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Curbside household hazardous waste collection program” means a collection service authorized by a public agency that is operated in accordance with Section 25163 and subdivision (d) of Section 25218.5 and that collects one or more of the following types of household hazardous waste:(1) Latex paint.(2) Used oil.(3) Used oil filters.(4) Household hazardous waste that is designated as a universal waste pursuant to this chapter or the regulations adopted by the department.(b) “Door-to-door household hazardous waste collection program” or “household hazardous waste residential pickup service” means a household hazardous waste service that meets all of the following requirements:(1) The program or service is operated by a public agency or its contractor.(2) The program or service is operated in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 25218.5.(3) The program or service collects household hazardous waste from individual residences and transports that waste in an inspected and certified hazardous waste transport vehicle operated by a registered hazardous waste transporter, to either of the following:(A) An authorized household hazardous waste collection facility.(B) A hazardous waste facility, as defined in Section 66260.10 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(c) “Household” means a single detached residence or a single unit of a multiple residence unit and all appurtenant structures.(d) “Household hazardous waste” means hazardous waste generated incidental to owning or maintaining a place of residence. Household hazardous waste does not include waste generated in the course of operating a business concern at a residence.(e) “Household hazardous waste collection facility” means a facility operated by a public agency, or its contractor, for the purpose of collecting, handling, treating, storing, recycling, or disposing of household hazardous waste. The operation of a household hazardous waste collection facility may include accepting hazardous waste from very small quantity generators if that acceptance is authorized pursuant to Section 25218.3. Household hazardous waste collection facilities include permanent household hazardous waste collection facilities, temporary household hazardous waste collection facilities, recycle-only household hazardous waste collection facilities, curbside household hazardous waste collection programs, door-to-door household hazardous waste collection program programs or household hazardous waste residential pickup service, services, and mobile household hazardous waste collection facilities.(f) “Materials exchange program” means a program conducted at a household hazardous waste collection facility that makes reusable household hazardous products or materials available to recipients.(g) “Mobile household hazardous waste collection facility” means a portable structure within which a household hazardous waste collection facility is operated and that meets all of the following conditions:(1) The facility is operated not more than four times in any one calendar year at the same location.(2) The facility is operated not more than three consecutive weeks within a two-month period at the same location.(3) Upon the termination of operations, all equipment, materials, and waste are removed from the site within 144 hours.(h) “Permanent household hazardous waste collection facility” means a permanent or semipermanent structure at a fixed location that meets both of the following conditions:(1) The facility is operated at the same location on a continuous, regular schedule.(2) The hazardous waste stored at the facility is removed within one year after collection.(i) “Person authorized by the public agency” means an employee of a public agency or a person from whom services are contracted by the public agency.(j) “Public agency” means a state or federal agency, county, city, or district.(k) “Quality assurance plan” means a written protocol prepared by a public agency, or its contractor, that is designed to ensure that reusable household hazardous products or materials that are collected by a household hazardous waste collection facility are evaluated to verify that the products or materials can be made available through a materials exchange program operated by that household hazardous waste collection facility.(l) “Recipient” means a person, as defined in Section 25118, including, but not limited to, a commercial entity, that accepts a reusable household hazardous product or material from a public agency, or its contractor, operating a materials exchange program pursuant to this article and that intends to use the product or material for its originally intended purpose or has a known market or disposition for the product or material.(m) “Recyclable household hazardous waste material” means any of the following:(1) Latex paint.(2) Used oil.(3) Used oil filters.(4) Antifreeze.(5) Spent lead-acid batteries.(6) Household hazardous waste that is designated as a universal waste pursuant to this chapter or the regulations adopted by the department, except a universal waste for which the department determines, by regulation, that there is no readily available authorized recycling facility capable of accepting and recycling that waste.(n) “Recycle-only household hazardous waste collection facility” means a household hazardous waste collection facility that is operated in accordance with Section 25218.8 and accepts for recycling only recyclable household hazardous waste materials.(o) “Reusable household hazardous product or material” means a container of household hazardous product, or a container of household hazardous material received at a household hazardous waste collection facility that is determined, in accordance with a quality assurance plan, to be suitable and acceptable for distribution in a materials exchange program at a household hazardous waste collection facility operating pursuant to this article.(p) “Temporary household hazardous waste collection facility” means a household hazardous waste collection facility that meets both of the following conditions:(1) The facility is operated not more than once for a period of not more than two days in any one month at the same location.(2) Upon termination of operations, all equipment, materials, and waste are removed from the site within 144 hours.(q) “Very small quantity generator” or “VSQG” means a generator that meets the criteria specified in Section 66260.10 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.SEC. 8. Section 25270.2 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25270.2. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Aboveground storage tank” or “storage tank” means a tank or container that has the capacity to store 55 gallons or more of petroleum that is substantially or totally above the surface of the ground, except that, for purposes of this chapter, “aboveground storage tank” or “storage tank” includes a tank in an underground area. “Aboveground storage tank” does not include any of the following:(1) A pressure vessel or boiler that is subject to Part 6 (commencing with Section 7620) of Division 5 of the Labor Code.(2) A tank containing hazardous waste or extremely hazardous waste, as respectively defined in Sections 25117 and 25115, if the owner or operator of the storage tank has a hazardous waste facilities permit from the Department of Toxic Substances Control or a permit by rule authorization from the unified program agency for the storage tank.(3) An aboveground oil production tank that is subject to Section 3106 of the Public Resources Code.(4) Oil-filled electrical equipment, including, but not limited to, transformers, circuit breakers, or capacitors, if the single piece of equipment meets either of the following conditions:(A) The equipment contains less than 10,000 gallons of dielectric fluid.(B) The equipment contains 10,000 gallons or more of dielectric fluid with PCB levels less than 50 parts per million, appropriate containment or diversionary structures or equipment are employed to prevent discharged oil from reaching a navigable water course, and the electrical equipment is visually inspected in accordance with the usual routine maintenance procedures of the owner or operator.(5) A tank regulated as an underground storage tank under Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 25280) of this division and Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 2610) of Division 3 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations and that does not meet the definition of a tank in an underground area.(6) A transportation-related tank facility, subject to the authority and control of the United States Department of Transportation, as defined in the Memorandum of Understanding between the Secretary of Transportation and the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency, as set forth in Appendix A to Part 112 (commencing with Section 112.1) of Subchapter D of Chapter I of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(7) A tank or tank facility located on and operated by a farm that is exempt from the federal spill prevention, control, and countermeasure rule requirements pursuant to Part 112 (commencing with Section 112.1) of Subchapter D of Chapter I of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(8) A tank in an underground area that has the capacity to store less than 55 gallons of petroleum, has secondary containment of the contents of the tank, associated piping, and ancillary equipment, until cleanup occurs, and the tank, piping, and ancillary equipment are inspected monthly, if the owner or operator maintains a log of inspection records for review by the unified program agency upon request.(b) “Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.(c) (1) “Certified unified program agency” or “CUPA” means the agency certified by the Secretary for Environmental Protection to implement the unified program specified in Chapter 6.11 (commencing with Section 25404) within a jurisdiction.(2) “Participating agency” or “PA” means an agency that has a written agreement with the CUPA pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 25404.3, and is approved by the secretary, to implement and enforce the unified program element specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 25404, in accordance with Sections 25404.1 and 25404.2.(3) (A) “Unified program agency” or “UPA” means the CUPA, or its participating agencies to the extent that each PA has been designated by the CUPA, pursuant to a written agreement, to implement and enforce the unified program element specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 25404. The UPAs have the responsibility and authority, to the extent provided by this chapter and Sections 25404.1 to 25404.2, inclusive, to implement and enforce the requirements of this chapter.(B) After a CUPA has been certified by the secretary, the unified program agency shall be the only agency authorized to enforce the requirements of this chapter.(C) This paragraph does not limit the authority or responsibility granted to the office, the board, and the regional boards by this chapter.(d) “Office” means the Office of the State Fire Marshal.(e) “Operator” means the person responsible for the overall operation of a tank facility.(f) “Owner” means the person who owns the tank facility or part of the tank facility.(g) “Person” means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, corporation, including a government corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or association. “Person” also includes any city, county, district, the University of California, the California State University, the state, any department or agency thereof, and the United States, to the extent authorized by federal law.(h) “Petroleum” means crude oil, or a fraction thereof, that is liquid at 60 degrees Fahrenheit temperature and 14.7 pounds per square inch absolute pressure.(i) “Regional board” means a California regional water quality control board.(j) “Release” means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, discharging, escaping, leaching, or disposing into the environment.(k) “Secretary” means the Secretary for Environmental Protection.(l) “Storage” or “store” means the containment, handling, or treatment of petroleum, for a period of time, including on a temporary basis.(m) “Storage capacity” means the aggregate capacity of all aboveground storage tanks at a tank facility.(n) “Tank facility” means one or more aboveground storage tanks, including any piping that is integral to the tanks, that contain petroleum and that are used by an owner or operator at a single location or site. For purposes of this chapter, a pipe is integrally related to an aboveground storage tank if the pipe is connected to the tank and meets any of the following:(1) The pipe is within the dike or containment area.(2) The pipe is between the containment area and the first flange or valve outside the containment area.(3) The pipe is connected to the first flange or valve on the exterior of the tank, if state or federal law does not require a containment area.(4) The pipe is connected to a tank in an underground area.(o) (1) “Tank in an underground area” means a stationary storage tank to which all of the following apply:(A) The storage tank is located in a structure that is at least 10 percent below the ground surface, including, but not limited to, a basement, cellar, shaft, pit, or vault.(B) The structure in which the storage tank is located, at a minimum, provides for secondary containment of the contents of the tank, piping, and ancillary equipment, until cleanup occurs. A shop-fabricated double-walled storage tank with a mechanical or electronic device used to detect leaks in the interstitial space meets the requirement for secondary containment of the contents of the tank.(C) The storage tank meets one or more of the following conditions:(i) The storage tank contains petroleum to be used or previously used as a lubricant or coolant in a motor engine or transmission, oil-filled operational equipment, or oil-filled manufacturing equipment, is situated on or above the surface of the floor, and the structure in which the tank is located provides enough space for direct viewing of the exterior of the tank except for the part of the tank in contact with the surface of the floor.(ii) The storage tank only contains petroleum that is determined to be a hazardous waste, complies with the hazardous waste tank standards pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 66265.190) of Chapter 15 of Division 4.5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations as it may be amended, and the tank facility has been issued a unified program facility permit pursuant to Section 25404.2 for generation, treatment, accumulation, or storage of hazardous waste.(iii) The storage tank contains petroleum and is used solely in connection with a fire pump or an emergency system, legally required standby system, or optional standby system as defined in the most recent version of the California Electrical Code (Section 700.2 of Article 700, Section 701.2 of Article 701, and Section 702.2 of Article 702, of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), is situated on or above the surface of the floor, and the structure in which the tank is located provides enough space for direct viewing of the exterior of the tank except for the part of the tank in contact with the surface of the floor.(iv) The storage tank does not meet the conditions in clause (i), (ii), or (iii), but meets all of the following conditions:(I) It contains petroleum.(II) It is situated on or above the surface of the floor.(III) The structure in which the storage tank is located provides enough space for direct viewing of the exterior of the tank, except for the part of the tank in contact with the surface of the floor.(IV) Except for an emergency vent that is solely designed to relieve excessive internal pressure, all piping connected to the tank, including any portion of a vent line, vapor recovery line, or fill pipe that is beneath the surface of the ground, and all ancillary equipment that is designed and constructed to contain petroleum, can either be visually inspected by direct viewing or has both secondary containment and leak detection that meet the requirements of the regulations adopted by the office pursuant to Section 25270.4.1.(2) Direct viewing of the exterior of the tank is not required under paragraph (1) if inspections of the interstitial space or containment structure are performed or if the storage tank has a mechanical or electronic device that will detect leaks in the interstitial space or containment structure and alert the tank operator.(3) (A) A storage tank in an underground area is not subject to Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 25280) if the storage tank meets the definition of a tank in an underground area, as provided in paragraph (1) and, except as specified in subparagraph (B), the regulations that apply to all new and existing tanks in underground areas and buried piping connected to tanks in underground areas have been adopted by the office pursuant to Section 25270.4.1.(B) A storage tank meeting the description of clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) shall continue to be subject to this chapter, and excluded from the definition of an underground storage tank in Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 25280), before and after the date the regulations specific to tanks in underground areas have been adopted by the office.(p) “Viewing” means visual inspection, and “direct viewing” means, in regard to a storage tank, direct visual inspection of the exterior of the tank, except for the part of the tank in contact with the surface of the floor, and, where applicable, the entire length of all piping and ancillary equipment, including all exterior surfaces, by a person or through the use of visual aids, including, but not limited to, mirrors, cameras, or video equipment.SEC. 9. Section 25270.4.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25270.4.5. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the owner or operator of a storage tank at a tank facility subject to this chapter shall prepare a spill prevention control and countermeasure plan applying good engineering practices to prevent petroleum releases using the same format required by Part 112 (commencing with Section 112.1) of Subchapter D of Chapter I of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, including owners and operators of tank facilities not subject to the general provisions in Section 112.1 of those regulations. An owner or operator specified in this subdivision shall conduct periodic inspections of the storage tank to ensure compliance with Part 112 (commencing with Section 112.1) of Subchapter D of Chapter I of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations. In implementing the spill prevention control and countermeasure plan, an owner or operator specified in this subdivision shall fully comply with the latest version of the regulations contained in Part 112 (commencing with Section 112.1) of Subchapter D of Chapter I of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(b) A tank facility located on and operated by a farm, nursery, logging site, or construction site is not subject to subdivision (a) if no storage tank at the location exceeds 20,000 gallons of petroleum and the cumulative petroleum storage capacity of the tank facility does not exceed 100,000 gallons. Unless excluded from the definition of an “aboveground storage tank” in Section 25270.2, the owner or operator of a tank facility exempt pursuant to this subdivision shall take the following actions:(1) Conduct a daily visual inspection of any storage tank storing petroleum. For purposes of this section, “daily” means every day that contents are added to or withdrawn from the tank, but no less than five days per week. The number of days may be reduced by the number of state or federal holidays that occur during the week if there is no addition to, or withdrawal from, the tank on the holiday. The UPA may reduce the frequency of inspections to not less than once every three days at a tank facility that is exempt pursuant to this section if the tank facility is not staffed on a regular basis, provided that the inspection is performed every day the tank facility is staffed.(2) Allow the UPA to conduct a periodic inspection of the tank facility.(3) If the UPA determines installation of secondary containment is necessary for the protection of the waters of the state, install a secondary means of containment for each tank or group of tanks where the secondary containment will, at a minimum, contain the entire contents of the largest tank protected by the secondary containment plus precipitation.(c) The owner or operator of a tank in an underground area that is subject to this chapter pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25270.3 may use the format adopted by the office to prepare a spill prevention control and countermeasure plan as specified in subdivision (a).SEC. 10. Section 25270.6 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25270.6. (a) (1) On or before January 1, annually, each owner or operator of a tank facility subject to this chapter shall file with the statewide information management system, a tank facility statement that shall identify the name and address of the tank facility, a contact person for the tank facility, the total petroleum storage capacity of the tank facility, and the location and contents of each petroleum storage tank that exceeds 10,000 gallons in storage capacity. A copy of a statement submitted previously pursuant to this section may be submitted in lieu of a new tank facility statement if no new or used storage tanks have been added to the tank facility or if no significant modifications have been made. For purposes of this section, a significant modification includes, but is not limited to, altering existing storage tanks or changing spill prevention or containment methods.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an owner or operator of a tank facility that submits a business plan, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 25501, to the statewide information management system and that complies with Sections 25503, 25505, 25505.1, 25507, 25507.2, 25508, 25508.1, and 25508.2, satisfies the requirement in paragraph (1) to file a tank facility statement.(b) Each owner or operator of a tank facility who is subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) shall annually pay a fee to the UPA, on or before a date specified by the UPA. The governing body of the UPA shall establish a fee, as part of the single fee system implemented pursuant to Section 25404.5, at a level sufficient to pay the necessary and reasonable costs incurred by the UPA in administering this chapter, including, but not limited to, inspections, enforcement, and administrative costs. The UPA shall also implement the fee accountability program established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25404.5 and the regulations adopted to implement that program.SEC. 11. Section 25270.8 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25270.8. Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 13272 of the Water Code, each owner or operator of a tank facility shall immediately, upon discovery, notify the Office of Emergency Services and the UPA using the appropriate 24-hour emergency number or the 911 number, as established by the UPA, or by the governing body of the UPA, of the occurrence of a discharge of any petroleum into or upon any waters of the state pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13272 of the Water Code.SEC. 12. Section 25288 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25288. (a) The local agency shall inspect every underground tank system within its jurisdiction at least once every year. The purpose of the inspection is to determine whether the tank system complies with the applicable requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 25299.3, including the design and construction standards of Section 25290.1, 25290.2, 25291, or 25292, whichever is applicable, whether the owner or operator has monitored and tested the tank system as required by the permit, and whether the tank system is in a safe operating condition.(b) After an inspection conducted pursuant to subdivision (a), the local agency shall prepare a compliance report detailing the inspection and shall send a copy of this report to the permitholder and the owner or operator, if the owner or operator is not the permitholder. Any report prepared pursuant to this section shall be consolidated into any other inspection reports required pursuant to Chapter 6.11 (commencing with Section 25404), the requirements listed in subdivision (c) of Section 25404, and the regulations adopted to implement the requirements listed in subdivision (c) of Section 25404.(c) In lieu of the annual local agency inspections, the local agency may require the permitholder to employ a special inspector to conduct the annual inspection. The local agency shall supply the permitholder with a list of at least three special inspectors that are qualified to conduct the inspection. The permitholder shall employ a special inspector from the list provided by the local agency. The special inspector’s authority shall be the same as that of the local agency as set forth in subdivision (a).(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the permitholder shall return to compliance within 30 days after receiving a compliance report or special inspection report prepared in accordance with subdivision (b) or (c), respectively.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the local agency may approve a plan to return to compliance in excess of 30 days, as long as the plan to return to compliance is received by the local agency within 30 calendar days of the permitholder receiving the compliance report or special inspection report prepared in accordance with subdivision (b) or (c), respectively.(3) Any corrective action conducted pursuant to the recommendations in the report shall be taken pursuant to Sections 25296.10 and 25299.36.SEC. 13. Section 25290.1 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25290.1. (a) Notwithstanding subdivision (o) of Section 25281, for purposes of this section, “product tight” means impervious to the liquid and vapor of the substance that is contained, or is to be contained, so as to prevent the seepage of the substance from the containment.(b) Notwithstanding Sections 25290.2 and 25291, every underground storage tank installed on or after July 1, 2004, shall meet the requirements of this section.(c) The underground storage tank shall be designed and constructed to provide primary and secondary levels of containment of the hazardous substances stored in it in accordance with the following performance standards:(1) Primary containment shall be constructed, operated, and maintained product tight and compatible with the stored product.(2) Secondary containment shall be constructed, operated, and maintained product tight. The secondary containment shall also be constructed, operated, and maintained in a manner to prevent structural weakening as a result of contact with any hazardous substances released from the primary containment, and also shall be capable of storing the hazardous substances for the maximum anticipated period of time necessary for the recovery of any released hazardous substance.(3) Secondary containment shall be constructed, operated, and maintained to prevent any water intrusion into the system by precipitation, infiltration, or surface runoff.(4) In the case of an installation with one primary tank, the secondary containment shall be large enough to contain at least 100 percent of the volume of the primary tank.(5) In the case of multiple primary tanks, the secondary containment shall be large enough to contain 150 percent of the volume of the largest primary tank placed in it, or 10 percent of the aggregate internal volume of all primary tanks, whichever is greater.(d) The underground tank system shall be designed and constructed with a continuous monitoring system capable of detecting the entry of the liquid- or vapor-phase of the hazardous substance stored in the primary containment into the secondary containment and capable of detecting water intrusion into the secondary containment.(e) The interstitial space of the underground storage tank that is buried shall be maintained under constant vacuum or pressure such that a breach in the primary or secondary containment is detected before the liquid or vapor phase of the hazardous substance stored in the underground storage tank is released into the environment. The use of interstitial liquid level measurement methods satisfies the requirements of this subdivision.(f) The underground storage tank shall be provided with equipment to prevent spills and overfills from the primary tank.(g) If different substances are stored in the same tank and in combination may cause a fire or explosion, or the production of flammable, toxic, or poisonous gas, or the deterioration of a primary or secondary container, those substances shall be separated in both the primary and secondary containment so as to avoid potential intermixing.(h) Underground pressurized piping that conveys a hazardous substance shall be equipped with an automatic line leak detector.(i) Before the underground storage tank is covered, enclosed, or placed in use, the standard installation testing requirements for underground storage systems specified in Section 2.4 of the Flammable and Combustible Liquids Code, adopted by the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA 30), as amended and published in the respective edition of the Uniform Fire Code, shall be followed.(j) Before the underground storage tank is placed in use, the underground storage tank shall be tested after installation using one of the following methods to demonstrate that the tank is product tight:(1) Enhanced leak detection.(2) An inert gas pressure test that has been certified by a third party and approved by the board.(3) A test method deemed equivalent to enhanced leak detection or an inert gas pressure test by the board in regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. An underground storage tank installed and tested in accordance with this subdivision is exempt from the requirements of Section 25292.5.(k) Notwithstanding Section 25281.5, for any system installed to meet the requirements of this section, those portions of vent lines, vapor recovery lines, and fill pipes that are beneath the surface of the ground are “pipe” as the term is defined in subdivision (m) of Section 25281, and therefore part of the underground storage tank system.SEC. 14. Section 25507 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25507. (a) Except as provided in this article, a business shall establish and implement a business plan for emergency response to a release or threatened release of a hazardous material in accordance with the standards prescribed in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 25503 if the business meets any of the following conditions at any unified program facility:(1) (A) It handles a hazardous material or a mixture containing a hazardous material that has a quantity at any one time during the reporting year that is equal to, or greater than, 55 gallons for materials that are liquids, 500 pounds for solids, or 200 cubic feet for compressed gas. The physical state and quantity present of mixtures shall be determined by the physical state of the mixture as a whole, not individual components, at standard temperature and pressure. This subparagraph does not apply to a gas that is described in paragraph (5).(B) For the purpose of this section, for compressed gases, if a hazardous material or mixture is determined to exceed threshold quantities at standard temperature and pressure, it shall be reported in the physical state at which it is stored. If the material is an extremely hazardous substance, as defined in Section 355.61 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, all amounts shall be reported in pounds.(2) It is required to submit chemical inventory information pursuant to Section 11022 of Title 42 of the United States Code.(3) It handles at any one time during the reporting year an amount of a hazardous material that is equal to, or greater than, the threshold planning quantity, under both of the following conditions:(A) The hazardous material is an extremely hazardous substance, as defined in Section 355.61 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(B) The threshold planning quantity for that extremely hazardous substance listed in Appendices A and B of Part 355 (commencing with Section 355.1) of Subchapter J of Chapter I of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations is less than 500 pounds.(4) (A) It handles at any one time during the reporting year a total weight of 5,000 pounds for solids or a total volume of 550 gallons for liquids, if the hazardous material is a solid or liquid substance that is classified as a hazard for purposes of Section 5194 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations solely as an irritant or sensitizer, except as provided in subparagraph (B).(B) If the hazardous material handled by the facility is a paint that will be recycled or otherwise managed under a paint product recovery program approved by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 48700) of Part 7 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code, the business is required to establish and implement a business plan only if the business handles at any one time during the reporting year a total weight of 10,000 pounds of solid hazardous materials or a total volume of 1,000 gallons of liquid hazardous materials.(5) It handles at any one time during the reporting year cryogenic, refrigerated, or compressed gas in a quantity of 1,000 cubic feet or more at standard temperature and pressure, if the gas is any of the following:(A) Classified as a hazard for the purposes of Section 5194 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations only for hazards due to simple asphyxiation or the release of pressure.(B) Oxygen, nitrogen, or nitrous oxide ordinarily maintained by a physician, dentist, podiatrist, veterinarian, pharmacist, or emergency medical service provider at their place of business.(C) Carbon dioxide or carbon dioxide mixed with simple asphyxiation gases that are classified as a hazard for purposes of Section 5194 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.(D) A nonflammable refrigerant gas, as defined in the California Fire Code, that is used in a refrigeration system.(E) A gas that is used in a closed fire suppression system.(6) It handles a radioactive material at any one time during the reporting year in quantities for which an emergency plan is required to be considered pursuant to Schedule C (Section 30.72) of Part 30 (commencing with Section 30.1), Part 40 (commencing with Section 40.1), or Part 70 (commencing with Section 70.1) of Chapter I of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or pursuant to any regulations adopted by the state in accordance with these federal regulations.(7) It handles perchlorate material, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 25210.5, in a quantity at any one time during the reporting year that is equal to, or greater than, the thresholds listed in paragraph (1).(8) (A) It handles a combustible metal or metal alloy that is defined as a pyrophoric or water-reactive material in the California Fire Code, in any quantity in raw stock, scrap, or powder form at any time during the reporting year.(B) It handles a combustible metal or metal alloy that is defined as a combustible dust, flammable solid, or magnesium in the California Fire Code, in a quantity in raw stock, scrap, or powder form at any one time during the reporting year that is equal to, or greater than, 100 pounds.(C) It handles a combustible metal or metal alloy that poses an explosive potential, when in molten form, in a quantity at any one time during the reporting year that is equal to, or greater than, 500 pounds.(b) The following hazardous materials are exempt from the requirements of this section:(1) Refrigerant gases, other than ammonia or flammable gas in a closed cooling system, that are used for comfort cooling for occupancies or space cooling for computer rooms.(2) Compressed air in cylinders, bottles, and tanks used by fire departments and other emergency response organizations for the purpose of emergency response and safety.(3) (A) Lubricating oil, if the total volume of each type of lubricating oil handled at a facility does not exceed 55 gallons and the total volume of all types of lubricating oil handled at that facility does not exceed 275 gallons at any one time.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “lubricating oil” means oil intended for use in an internal combustion crankcase, or the transmission, gearbox, differential, or hydraulic system of an automobile, bus, truck, vessel, airplane, heavy equipment, or other machinery powered by an internal combustion or electric powered engine. “Lubricating oil” does not include used oil, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 25250.1.(4) Both of the following, if the aggregate storage capacity of oil at the facility is less than 1,320 gallons and a spill prevention control and countermeasure plan is not required pursuant to Part 112 (commencing with Section 112.1) of Subchapter D of Chapter I of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations:(A) Fluid in a hydraulic system.(B) Oil-filled electrical equipment that is not contiguous to an electric facility.(5) (A) A hazardous material that meets the definition of a consumer product and is handled at, and found in, a retail establishment and intended for direct sale to the end user.(B) The exemption provided for in subparagraph (A) shall not apply to either of the following:(i) A consumer product handled at a facility that manufactures that product, or a separate warehouse or distribution center where there are no direct sales to consumers, or where a product is dispensed on the retail premises.(ii) A consumer product sold at a retail establishment that has a National Fire Protection Association or “NFPA” or Hazardous Materials Identification System or “HMIS” rating of 3 or 4 and is stored, at any time, in quantities equal to, or greater than, 165 gallons for a liquid, 600 cubic feet for a gas, and 1,500 pounds for a solid. If a unified program agency determines that a consumer product stored at a retail establishment is stored at or above a reportable threshold listed in subdivision (a), and poses a significant potential hazard, the unified program agency may require the product to be reported in accordance with this chapter.(6) Propane that is for on-premises use, storage, or both, in an amount not to exceed 500 gallons, that is for the sole purpose of cooking, heating employee work areas, and heating water within that facility, unless the unified program agency finds, and provides notice to the business handling the propane, that the handling of the on-premises propane requires the submission of a business plan, or any portion of a business plan, in response to public health, safety, or environmental concerns.(7) Liquid or gaseous fuel in fuel tanks on vehicles or motorized equipment. For purposes of this section, the fuel tank shall be integral to the operation of the vehicle or motorized equipment.(8) Treated wood and treated wood waste, unless the requirement that the facility submit chemical inventory information pursuant to Section 11022 of Title 42 of the United States Code applies. For the purposes of this section, the definition of “treated wood” set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 25230.1 applies. For the purposes of this section, the definition of “treated wood waste” set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 25230.1 applies. Treated wood or treated wood waste that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of this section pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5), is exempt if it satisfies the requirements of this paragraph.(c) In addition to the authority specified in subdivision (e), the governing body of the unified program agency may, in exceptional circumstances, following notice and public hearing, exempt from Section 25506 a hazardous material, as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 25501, if the unified program agency finds that the hazardous material would not pose a present or potential danger to the environment or to human health and safety if the hazardous material was released into the environment. The unified program agency shall send a notice to the secretary within 15 days from the effective date of any exemption granted pursuant to this subdivision.(d) A unified program agency, upon application by a handler, may exempt the handler, under conditions that the unified program agency determines to be proper, from any portion of the requirements to establish and maintain a business plan, upon a written finding that the exemption would not pose a significant present or potential hazard to human health or safety or to the environment, or affect the ability of the unified program agency and emergency response personnel to effectively respond to the release of a hazardous material, and that there are unusual circumstances justifying the exemption. The unified program agency shall specify in writing the basis for any exemption under this subdivision.(e) A unified program agency, upon application by a handler, may exempt a hazardous material from the inventory provisions of this article upon proof that the material does not pose a significant present or potential hazard to human health or safety or to the environment if released into the workplace or environment. The unified program agency shall specify in writing the basis for any exemption under this subdivision.(f) A unified program agency shall adopt procedures to provide for public input when approving applications submitted pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e).SEC. 15. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act or because costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.